Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SCHEDULE FOR PHASING IN FOUNDATIONAL
CAPABILITIES AND FOUNDATIONAL PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.  Section 115, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 115.  [ (1) On or before June  30, 2016, the Oregon Health Authority shall first submit the for-
mula adopted under ORS 431.380, as amended by section 28 of this  2015 Act, to the Legislative Fiscal
Office.]
[(2)] (1) [ On or before January 1, 2017, ] The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Adopt the initial statewide public health modernization  assessment and develop the initial
statewide public health modernization plan as required by  [ section 4 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 431.115;
and
(b) Subject to [ subsections (3) and (4) ] subsection (2)  of this section, establish a schedule by
which local public health authorities, as defined in [ section 2 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 431.003, shall
[first] submit local plans for  applying the foundational capabilities established under [ section 9 of this
2015 Act ] ORS 431.131 and implementing the foundational programs established under [ section 17
of this 2015 Act ] ORS 431.141 as required by ORS [ 431.385] 431.417.
[(3) The schedule established under subsection (2)(b) of this section: ]
[(a) May impose different dates for different local public health authorities; and ]
[(b) Must require that all  local public health authorities first submit local plans no later than De-
cember 31, 2023. ]
(2) The schedule established under subsection (1)(b) of this section must  require that all
local public health authorities  first submit local plans implementing ORS 431.131 and 431.141
on or before December 31, 2023.
[(4) The Oregon Health Authority shall collaborate with each local public  health authority in pre-
scribing a date by which that local public health authority must first submit local plans  as described
in subsection (2)(b) of this section. ]
[(5) Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 431.415, 431.416 and 431.385 by sections 25 to  27 of
this 2015 Act, a local public health authority is required to submit a local plan to the authority as re-
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 1
quired by ORS 431.385  as in effect immediately before the effective date of this 2015 Act until the local
public health authority first submits a local plan pursuant to the schedule established under subsection
(2)(b) of this section. ]
(3) In consultation with local public health authorities, the Oregon Health Authority  may
modify the schedule established under  subsection (1)(b) of this section to require local public
health authorities to apply foundational capabilities and implement foundational programs
over a period of time, provided that all local public health  authorities submit local plans for
applying all foundational  capabilities and implementing all foundational programs no later
than December 31, 2023.
ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS
SECTION 2.
 ORS 431.115 is amended to read:
431.115. (1) For the purpose of  fulfilling its duties under ORS 431.110 (2), (3) and (4), the Oregon
Health Authority shall:
(a) Adopt and update as necessary a statewide public health modernization assessment;
(b) In consideration of  the statewide public health modernization assessment, develop and modify
as necessary a statewide public health modernization plan;
(c) Implement the statewide public health modernization plan;
(d) Subject to the provisions of ORS 431.380, develop and modify as necessary plans for the
distribution of funds to local public health authorities;
(e) Implement plans for the distribution of funds to local public health authorities;
(f) Coordinate state and local administration  of the foundational programs established under
ORS 431.141;
(g) Approve  local plans for applying the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131
and implementing the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141  as required by ORS
431.417;
(h) Monitor the progress of local public  health authorities in meeting statewide public health
goals, including applying  the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and imple-
menting the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141;
(i) For the purpose of making distributions  under ORS 431.380, consult with and consider the
recommendations of local public  health authorities on the total cost to local public health authori-
ties of applying the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and implementing the
foundational programs established under ORS 431.141 [ as identified by local public  health authorities
in community modernization assessments adopted under ORS 431.413 ];
(j) Use accountability metrics to encourage the effective and equitable provision  of public
health services by local public health authorities;
[(j)] (k) Use incentives [ adopted under ORS 431.380 ] to encourage the effective and equitable
provision of public health services by local public health authorities;
[(k)] (L) Seek funding, including in the form of federal grants, for ORS 431.001  to 431.550 and
431.990; and
[(L)] (m) Coordinate and collaborate with  federal agencies in implementing ORS 431.001 to
431.550 and 431.990.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall solicit input from the Conference  of Local Health Offi-
cials and local public health authorities in:
(a) Establishing the foundational capabilities under ORS 431.131 and the  foundational programs
under ORS 431.141;
(b) Adopting and updating a statewide public  health modernization assessment under subsection
(1)(a) of this section;
(c) Developing and modifying a statewide  public health modernization plan under subsection
(1)(b) of this section; and
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 2
(d) Developing and modifying plans for the distribution of  funds under subsection (1)(d) of this
section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 431.123 is amended to read:
431.123. The Oregon Public Health Advisory Board shall:
(1) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on the development  of statewide
public health policies and goals;
(2) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on how other statewide priorities,
such as the  provision of early learning services and the delivery of health care services, affect and
are affected by statewide public health policies and goals;
(3) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health  Policy Board on the establishment of the
foundational capabilities under ORS 431.131, the foundational programs under ORS 431.141 and any
other public health program or activity under ORS 431.147;
(4) Make  recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on the adoption and updating of
the statewide public health modernization assessment under ORS 431.115;
(5) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on  the development of and any
modification to the statewide public health modernization plan developed under ORS 431.115;
(6) Establish accountability metrics for the purpose of  evaluating the progress of the
Oregon Health Authority and local public health  authorities in achieving statewide public
health goals;
[(6)] (7) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Authority  and the Oregon Health Policy
Board on:
(a) The development of , and any modification to , plans  developed under ORS 431.115 for the
distribution of funds to local public health authorities  under ORS 431.380 ; and
(b) The  total cost to local public health authorities of applying the foundational capabilities es-
tablished under ORS 431.131 and implementing the  foundational programs established under ORS
431.141;
(8) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on  the use of account-
ability metrics  by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 431.380 to encourage the effective
and equitable provision of public health services by local public health authorities;
[(7)] (9) Make recommendations to the Oregon Health Policy Board on the incorporation and
use of  incentives by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 431.380 to encourage the effective and
equitable provision of public health services by local public health authorities;
[(8)] (10) Provide support to  local public health authorities in developing local plans to apply the
foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and implement  the foundational programs
established under ORS 431.141 as required by ORS 431.417;
[(9)] (11) Monitor the  progress of local public health authorities in meeting statewide public
health goals, including  employing the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and
implementing the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141;
[(10)] (12) Assist the Oregon  Health Authority in seeking funding, including in the form of fed-
eral grants, for ORS 431.001 to 431.550 and 431.990; and
[(11)] (13) Assist the Oregon Health Authority in coordinating and collaborating with federal
agencies.
FUNDING OF LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH AUTHORITIES
SECTION 4.
 ORS 431.380 is amended to read:
431.380. (1) From state moneys [ available to ] that the  Oregon Health Authority receives for the
purpose of funding the  foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and the foundational
programs established under ORS 431.141, the Oregon Health Authority shall  make payments to local
public health authorities under  this section. The Oregon Health Authority shall each biennium
submit to the Oregon Public Health  Advisory Board and the Legislative Fiscal Office a formula that
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 3
provides for the  equitable distribution of moneys. [ As a part of the formula, the Oregon Health Au-
thority shall: ] The Oregon Health Authority shall incorporate into the formula:
[(a) Establish a baseline amount to be invested in local public health  activities and services by the
state;]
(a) A method for distributing to local public health authorities  a base amount of state
moneys received by the Oregon Health Authority  pursuant to this subsection, taking into
consideration the population of each local public health authority, the  burden of disease
borne by communities located within the jurisdiction  of each local public health authority,
the overall  health status of communities located within the jurisdiction of each local public
health authority and the ability of each local public health  authority to invest in local public
health activities and services;
(b) [ Establish] A method for awarding matching funds to a local public  health authority that
invests in local public health activities and services above the [ baseline] base amount [ established
by the Oregon  Health Authority for that local public health authority ] distributed in accordance
with paragraph (a) of this subsection ; and
(c) [ Provide ] A method for the use of incentives as described in subsection [ (4)] (3) of this sec-
tion.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall submit the formula adopted under subsection (1) of
this section [ must be submitted ] to  the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board and the Legislative
Fiscal Office no later than June 30 of each even-numbered  year. At the same time that the
Oregon Health Authority submits  the formula, the Oregon Health Authority shall submit to
the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board and the Legislative  Fiscal Office an estimate of the
amount of state moneys necessary to fund in part or  in whole the foundational capabilities
established under ORS 431.131 and the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141.
[(3) In establishing a baseline amount for the purpose of awarding matching funds under sub-
section (1)(b) of this section, the Oregon Health  Authority shall consider the population of each local
public health authority, the burden of disease borne by communities located within the jurisdiction of
each local public health authority, the overall health status of communities located within the  jurisdic-
tion of each local public health authority and the ability of each local  public health authority to invest
in local public health activities and services. ]
[(4)] (3) The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt by rule incentives [ to encourage ] and a
process for identifying, updating  and applying accountability metrics, for the purpose of en-
couraging the effective and equitable provision  of public health services by local public health au-
thorities.
[(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the Oregon Health Authority from distributing funds to a lo-
cal public health authority through a competitive contract or grant process or on the basis of need  for
applying the foundational capabilities  established under ORS 431.131 and implementing the founda-
tional programs established under ORS 431.141. ]
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits  the Oregon Health Authority from distributing state
moneys that the Oregon  Health Authority receives for the purpose of funding the founda-
tional capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and  the foundational programs established
under ORS 431.141 to local public health authorities on an individual  basis as opposed to a
statewide basis,  or through a competitive grant or contract process or on the basis of need,
if the state moneys received are insufficient to adequately fund  local public health authori-
ties on a statewide basis.
SECTION 4a.
(1) Each biennium, the Oregon Health Authority shall  submit to the Leg-
islative Fiscal Office  a report on the application of the formula described in ORS 431.380,
containing at a minimum:
(a) A statement of the  amount of state moneys that the Oregon Health Authority re-
ceived for the purpose of funding the foundational  capabilities established under ORS 431.131
and the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141;
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 4
(b) A description  of how state moneys that the Oregon Health Authority received for the
purpose of funding the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and the foun-
dational programs established under ORS 431.141 were distributed to local public  health au-
thorities; and
(c) The level of work funded for each foundational capability and each  foundational pro-
gram and the progress of local public health authorities in meeting accountability metrics.
(2) The Oregon  Public Health Advisory Board shall, each biennium, make recommenda-
tions to the Oregon  Health Authority on the priorities for the Oregon Health Authority and
on the priorities of local public health  authorities for each foundational capability established
under ORS 431.131 and each foundational program established under ORS 431.141, based on
state moneys that the Oregon Health Authority received for  the purpose of funding the
foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and the foundational programs es-
tablished under ORS 431.141.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 431.382 is amended to read:
431.382. [If the Oregon  Health Authority fails to distribute an amount of moneys to a local public
health authority equal  to or in excess of the baseline amount established under ORS 431.380 (1)(a), a
local public health authority may request to transfer responsibility for fulfilling the  local public health
authority’s duties under ORS 431.001 to 431.550 and 431.990 and the other  public health laws of this
state to the Oregon Health Authority. If a  local public health authority requests to transfer responsi-
bilities under this  section, the moneys available to the local public health authority under ORS 431.380
revert to the Oregon Health Authority. A request to transfer made under this section must be made  in
the form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority and takes effect 180 days after the
Oregon Health Authority receives the request. ]
(1) If the Oregon Health Authority does not receive  state moneys in an amount that
equals or exceeds the  estimate that the Oregon Health Authority submits to the Legislative
Fiscal Office under ORS 431.380 (2), the governing body of the county in which  a local public
health authority operates may adopt an ordinance transferring the responsibility for fulfilling
the local public health  authority’s duties under ORS 431.001 to 431.550 and 431.990 and the
other public health laws of this state to the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall prescribe the  form and manner of informing the
Oregon Health Authority that the local public health  authority has made a transfer under
this section.
(3) A transfer under this section  may not take effect until 180 days after the date on
which an ordinance mandating the transfer is adopted.
(4) The local public health authority that makes  a transfer under this section is not eli-
gible to receive any moneys pursuant to ORS 431.380, and the Oregon Health Authority may
use the moneys to provide or to contract for the provision of public health programs and
public health activities within the local public health authority’s jurisdiction.
(5) If a  local public health authority makes a transfer under this section, the Oregon
Health Authority is not obligated to provide or to contract for the  provision of public health
programs and public health activities within the local public health authority’s jurisdiction.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 431.417 is amended to read:
431.417. [(1) Each local public health authority shall submit  a local plan for applying the founda-
tional capabilities  established under ORS 431.131 and implementing the foundational programs estab-
lished under ORS 431.141 to the Oregon Health Authority in  a form and manner prescribed by the
authority.]
[(2) The Oregon Health Authority may make  suggestions to a local public health authority on
modifying a plan  submitted under this section. Suggestions must be based on emerging best practices
for the effective application and implementation of public health programs and activities.  A local public
health authority may request technical assistance from  the Oregon Health Authority on implementing
the suggestions.]
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 5
(1) The  Oregon Health Authority may by rule require each local public health authority
to submit a plan, in a form and manner prescribed by  the Oregon Health Authority, that
describes how the local public health  authority will use moneys made available under ORS
431.380.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority may enter into an agreement with each local public
health authority that describes the work the local public health authority  agrees to perform
and the amount of state  funding the local public health authority will receive under ORS
431.380.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may enter into one or more agreements with  a local
public health authority for purposes of distributing funds, or providing incentives,  to the lo-
cal public health authority that are available through federal  grants or other sources. Before
entering into an agreement under this  section, the Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by
rule a process by which a local public health authority must submit the documentation nec-
essary to receive incentives under an agreement authorized by this subsection.
ASSESSMENT AND EPIDEMIOLOGY
SECTION 7.
 ORS 431.132 is amended to read:
431.132. (1) For the purpose of establishing the foundational capabilities under ORS 431.131,  as-
sessment and epidemiology include, but are not limited to, the knowledge, skills and abilities  nec-
essary to:
(a) Identify and respond to disease outbreaks and epidemics;
(b) Analyze and respond to information related to disease outbreaks and epidemics;
(c) Conduct and assess surveys about health behaviors and practices;
(d) Collect and maintain vital records and statistics;
(e) Process data  from a variety of sources, including vital records, health records, hospital data,
insurance data and indicators of community or environmental health;
(f) Analyze key indicators of a community’s health;
(g) Analyze data related to the causes and burdens of disease, injury, disability and death;
(h) Prioritize and respond to requests for data processed  and analyzed as described in this sec-
tion and communicate the response in a manner that  is accurate, statistically valid and usable by
the requester;
(i) Identify how  disease, injury, disability and death disproportionately affect certain popu-
lations, including populations specific to sex, race, ethnicity and socioeconomic status;
(j) Conduct a [ public health modernization ] community health assessment and identify priorities
arising from that assessment[ , as required by ORS 431.115 or 431.413 ]; and
(k) Use relevant data to implement, monitor, evaluate and modify state health improvement
plans or community health improvement plans.
(2) For purposes of this section,  the Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules differentiating
between the  knowledge, skills and abilities that are necessary for state governance and that are
necessary for local governance.
EVIDENCE-BASED BEST PRACTICES
SECTION 8.
 ORS 431.148 is amended to read:
431.148. The Oregon Health Authority may adopt by rule evidence-based best practices for the
purpose of assisting local public health authorities [ implement] in implementing  the foundational
programs established under ORS 431.141 and  any other public health program or activity established
under ORS  431.147. Rules adopted under this section are only for the purpose of assisting local
public health authorities and are not mandatory guidelines for the  implementation of the programs
or activities.
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 6
OREGON PUBLIC HEALTH ADVISORY BOARD
SECTION 8a.  ORS 431.122 is amended to read:
431.122. (1)(a) The Oregon  Public Health Advisory Board is established for the purpose of ad-
vising and making recommendations to the Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon  Health Policy
Board. The Oregon Public Health Advisory Board shall consist of:
(A) [Thirteen] Fourteen members appointed by the Governor as specified in paragraph (b) of this
subsection;
(B) The Public Health Director or the Public Health Director’s designee;
(C) If the Public Health Director is not the State Health Officer,  the State Health Officer or a
physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 acting as the State Health Officer’s designee;
(D) If the Public Health Director is the State Health Officer,  a representative from the Oregon
Health Authority who is familiar with public health programs  and public health activities in this
state; and
(E) A designee of the Oregon Health Policy Board.
(b) The Governor shall appoint the following individuals to the board:
(A) A state employee who has technical expertise in the field of public health;
(B) A local public health administrator who supervises public health programs  and public health
activities in Benton, Clackamas, Deschutes, Jackson, Lane, Marion, Multnomah or Washington
County;
(C) A local public health administrator who supervises public health programs  and public health
activities in Coos, Douglas, Josephine, Klamath, Linn, Polk, Umatilla or Yamhill County;
(D) A local public health administrator who supervises public  health programs and public health
activities in Clatsop, Columbia, Crook, Curry, Hood  River, Jefferson, Lincoln, Tillamook, Union or
Wasco  County;
(E) A local public health administrator who supervises public health programs  and public health
activities in Baker, Gilliam, Grant, Harney, Lake, Malheur, Morrow, Sherman, Wallowa or  Wheeler
County;
(F) A local health officer who is not a local public health administrator;
(G) An individual who represents the Conference of  Local Health Officials created under ORS
431.330;
(H) An individual who is a member of,  or who represents, a federally recognized Indian
tribe in this state;
[(H)] (I) An individual who represents coordinated care organizations;
[(I)] (J) An individual who  represents health care organizations that are not coordinated care
organizations;
[(J)] (K) An individual  who represents individuals who provide public health services directly
to the public;
[(K)] (L) An expert in the field of public health who has a background in academia;
[(L)] (M) An expert in population health metrics; and
[(M)] (N) An at-large member.
(2)(a) The term of office  for a board member appointed under this section is four years, but a
member serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a member,  the
Governor shall appoint  a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A member is
eligible  for  reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(b) Members of the board described in subsection  (1)(a)(B) to (E) of this section are nonvoting
ex officio members of the board.
(3) A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for  the transaction of
business.
(4) Official action by the board requires the approval of a majority of the voting members of  the
board.
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 7
(5) The board shall elect one of its voting members to serve as chairperson.
(6) The board shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson or of a
majority of the voting members of the board.
(7) The board may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the board.
(8) The board may  establish committees and subcommittees necessary for the operation of the
board.
(9) Voting members of the board are entitled to compensation and expenses  as provided in ORS
292.495.
OPERATIVE  DATE
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 4a of this  2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 431.115, 431.122,
431.123, 431.132, 431.148, 431.380, 431.382 and 431.417 and section 115, chapter 736, Oregon Laws
2015, by sections 1 to 4 and 5 to 8a of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board may take
any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is neces-
sary to enable the authority and the board to exercise, on  and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, powers  and functions conferred on
the authority and the board by section 4a of this 2017 Act and the  amendments to ORS
431.115, 431.122, 431.123, 431.132, 431.148, 431.380, 431.382 and 431.417 and section 115,  chapter
736, Oregon Laws 2015, by sections 1 to 4 and 5 to 8a of this 2017 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 10. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 11. This 2017 Act takes effect  on the 91st day after the date on which the
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 8
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2310 (HB 2310-B) Page 9